Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.090

Intercounty rural library districts—Establishment.

Intercounty rural library districts may be established to provide throughout several counties free public library service similar to that provided within a single county by a rural county library district.

[ 1947 c 75 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8246-1.]

NOTES:

Dissolution—Disposition of property: RCW 27.12.320.